src/scripts/Polish/unicodechars.foma
#Do not edit, file automatically generated.
#
#For g2p:
define UnicodeToNativeTranslit 
[%ß|%ẞ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ñ|%Ñ] -> {ń} || _ ,,
[%ç|%Ç] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ş|%Ş] -> {sz} || _ ,,
[%ḉ|%Ḉ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%á|%Á] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%é|%É] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%í|%Í] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ú|%Ú] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ý|%Ý] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ä|%Ä] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ü|%Ü] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ö|%Ö] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%č|%Č] -> {cz} || _ ,,
[%ž|%Ž] -> {ż} || _ ,,
[%š|%Š] -> {sz} || _ ,,
[%đ|%Đ] -> {dź} || _ ,,
[%å|%Å] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ø|%Ø] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ř|%Ř] -> {rz} || _ ,,
[%ň|%Ň] -> {ń} || _ ,,
[%ě|%Ě] -> {ie} || _ ,,
[%ľ|%Ľ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ô|%Ô] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ĺ|%Ĺ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ŕ|%Ŕ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ů|%Ů] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ď|%Ď] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ť|%Ť] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%à|%À] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%è|%È] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ì|%ì] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ò|%Ò] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ù|%Ù] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ã|%Ã] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ë|%Ë] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ō|%Ō] -> {ó} || _ ,,
[%ă|%Ă] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ŏ|%Ŏ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%õ|%Õ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ŭ|%Ŭ] -> {ł} || _ ,,
[%α|%Α] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ά|%Ά] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%β|%Β] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%γ|%Γ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%δ|%Δ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ε|%Ε] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%έ|%Έ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ζ|%Ζ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%η|%Η] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ή|%Ή] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%θ|%Θ] -> {th} || _ ,,
[%ι|%Ι] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ί|%Ί] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ϊ|%Ϊ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ΐ|%ΐ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%κ|%Κ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%λ|%Λ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%μ|%Μ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ν|%Ν] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ξ|%Ξ] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%ο|%Ο] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ό|%Ό] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%π|%Π] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%ρ|%Ρ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%σ|%Σ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ς|%ς] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%τ|%Τ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%υ|%Υ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ύ|%Ύ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ϋ|%Ϋ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ΰ|%ΰ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%φ|%Φ] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%χ|%Χ] -> {ch} || _ ,,
[%ψ|%Ψ] -> {ps} || _ ,,
[%ω|%Ω] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ώ|%Ώ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ἀ|%Ἀ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ἁ|%Ἁ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ἂ|%Ἂ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ἃ|%Ἃ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ἄ|%Ἄ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ἅ|%Ἅ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ἆ|%Ἆ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ἇ|%Ἇ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ἐ|%Ἐ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἑ|%Ἑ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἒ|%Ἒ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἓ|%Ἓ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἔ|%Ἔ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἕ|%Ἕ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἠ|%Ἠ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἡ|%Ἡ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἢ|%Ἢ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἣ|%Ἣ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἤ|%Ἤ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἥ|%Ἥ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἦ|%Ἦ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἧ|%Ἧ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ἰ|%Ἰ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ἱ|%Ἱ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ἲ|%Ἲ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ἳ|%Ἳ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ἴ|%Ἴ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ἵ|%Ἵ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ἶ|%Ἶ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ἷ|%Ἷ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ὀ|%Ὀ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὁ|%Ὁ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὂ|%Ὂ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὃ|%Ὃ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὄ|%Ὄ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὅ|%Ὅ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὐ|%ὐ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὑ|%Ὑ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὒ|%ὒ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὓ|%Ὓ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὔ|%ὔ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὕ|%Ὕ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὖ|%ὖ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὗ|%Ὗ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὠ|%Ὠ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὡ|%Ὡ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὢ|%Ὢ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὣ|%Ὣ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὤ|%Ὤ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὥ|%Ὥ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὦ|%Ὦ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὧ|%Ὧ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὰ|%Ὰ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ά|%Ά] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ὲ|%Ὲ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%έ|%Έ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ὴ|%Ὴ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ή|%Ή] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ὶ|%Ὶ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ί|%Ί] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ὸ|%Ὸ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ό|%Ό] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ὺ|%Ὺ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ύ|%Ύ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ὼ|%Ὼ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ώ|%Ώ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾀ|%ᾀ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾁ|%ᾁ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾂ|%ᾂ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾃ|%ᾃ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾄ|%ᾄ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾅ|%ᾅ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾆ|%ᾆ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾇ|%ᾇ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾈ|%ᾈ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾉ|%ᾉ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾊ|%ᾊ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾋ|%ᾋ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾌ|%ᾌ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾍ|%ᾍ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾎ|%ᾎ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾏ|%ᾏ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾐ|%ᾐ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾑ|%ᾑ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾒ|%ᾒ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾓ|%ᾓ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾔ|%ᾔ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾕ|%ᾕ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾖ|%ᾖ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾗ|%ᾗ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾘ|%ᾘ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾙ|%ᾙ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾚ|%ᾚ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾛ|%ᾛ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾜ|%ᾜ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾝ|%ᾝ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾞ|%ᾞ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾟ|%ᾟ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ᾠ|%ᾠ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾡ|%ᾡ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾢ|%ᾢ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾣ|%ᾣ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾤ|%ᾤ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾥ|%ᾥ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾦ|%ᾦ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾧ|%ᾧ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾨ|%ᾨ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾩ|%ᾩ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾪ|%ᾪ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾫ|%ᾫ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾬ|%ᾬ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾭ|%ᾭ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾮ|%ᾮ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾯ|%ᾯ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ᾰ|%Ᾰ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾱ|%Ᾱ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾲ|%ᾲ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾳ|%ᾳ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾴ|%ᾴ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾶ|%ᾶ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾷ|%ᾷ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ᾼ|%ᾼ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ῂ|%ῂ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ῃ|%ῃ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ῄ|%ῄ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ῆ|%ῆ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ῇ|%ῇ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ῌ|%ῌ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ῐ|%Ῐ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ῑ|%Ῑ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ῒ|%ῒ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ΐ|%ΐ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ῖ|%ῖ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ῗ|%ῗ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ῠ|%Ῠ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ῡ|%Ῡ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ῢ|%ῢ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ΰ|%ΰ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ῤ|%ῤ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ῥ|%Ῥ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ῦ|%ῦ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ῧ|%ῧ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ῲ|%ῲ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ῳ|%ῳ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ῴ|%ῴ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ῶ|%ῶ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ῷ|%ῷ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ῼ|%ῼ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ⰰ|%Ⰰ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ⰱ|%Ⰱ] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%ⰲ|%Ⰲ] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%ⰳ|%Ⰳ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ⰴ|%Ⰴ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ⰵ|%Ⰵ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ⰶ|%Ⰶ] -> {ż} || _ ,,
[%ⰷ|%Ⰷ] -> {dz} || _ ,,
[%ⰸ|%Ⰸ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ⰹ|%Ⰹ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ⰺ|%Ⰺ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ⰻ|%Ⰻ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ⰼ|%Ⰼ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ⰽ|%Ⰽ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ⰾ|%Ⰾ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ⰿ|%Ⰿ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ⱀ|%Ⱀ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ⱁ|%Ⱁ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ⱂ|%Ⱂ] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%ⱃ|%Ⱃ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ⱄ|%Ⱄ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ⱅ|%Ⱅ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ⱆ|%Ⱆ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ⱇ|%Ⱇ] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%ⱈ|%Ⱈ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ⱉ|%Ⱉ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ⱊ|%Ⱊ] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%ⱋ|%Ⱋ] -> {ś} || _ ,,
[%ⱌ|%Ⱌ] -> {ć} || _ ,,
[%ⱍ|%Ⱍ] -> {cz} || _ ,,
[%ⱎ|%Ⱎ] -> {sz} || _ ,,
[%ⱏ|%Ⱏ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ⱐ|%Ⱐ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ⱑ|%Ⱑ] -> {ie} || _ ,,
[%ⱒ|%Ⱒ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ⱓ|%Ⱓ] -> {ju} || _ ,,
[%ⱔ|%Ⱔ] -> {ę} || _ ,,
[%ⱕ|%Ⱕ] -> {ę} || _ ,,
[%ⱖ|%Ⱖ] -> {jo} || _ ,,
[%ⱗ|%Ⱗ] -> {ję} || _ ,,
[%ⱘ|%Ⱘ] -> {ą} || _ ,,
[%ⱙ|%Ⱙ] -> {ją} || _ ,,
[%ⱚ|%Ⱚ] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%ⱛ|%Ⱛ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ⱜ|%Ⱜ] -> {sz} || _ ,,
[%ⱝ|%Ⱝ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ⱞ|%Ⱞ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ְ|%ְ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ֱ|%ֱ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ֲ|%ֲ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ֳ|%ֳ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ִ|%ִ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ֵ|%ֵ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ֶ|%ֶ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ַ|%ַ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ָ|%ָ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ֹ|%ֹ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ֺ|%ֺ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ֻ|%ֻ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ׁ|%ׁ] -> {sz} || _ ,,
[%ׂ|%ׂ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ׇ|%ׇ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%א|%א] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ב|%ב] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%ג|%ג] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ד|%ד] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ה|%ה] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ו|%ו] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ז|%ז] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ח|%ח] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ט|%ט] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%י|%י] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ך|%ך] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%כ|%כ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ל|%ל] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ם|%ם] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%מ|%מ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ן|%ן] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%נ|%נ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ס|%ס] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ע|%ע] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ף|%ף] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%פ|%פ] -> {pe} || _ ,,
[%ץ|%ץ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%צ|%צ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ק|%ק] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ר|%ר] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ש|%ש] -> {sz} || _ ,,
[%ת|%ת] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ׯ|%ׯ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%װ|%װ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ױ|%ױ] -> {wj} || _ ,,
[%ײ|%ײ] -> {jj} || _ ,,
[%𝐚|%𝐚] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%𝐛|%𝐛] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%𝐜|%𝐜] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%𝐝|%𝐝] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%𝐞|%𝐞] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%𝐟|%𝐟] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%𝐠|%𝐠] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%𝐡|%𝐡] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%𝐢|%𝐢] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%𝐣|%𝐣] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%𝐤|%𝐤] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%𝐥|%𝐥] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%𝐦|%𝐦] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%𝐧|%𝐧] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%𝐨|%𝐨] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%𝐩|%𝐩] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝐪|%𝐪] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%𝐫|%𝐫] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%𝐬|%𝐬] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%𝐭|%𝐭] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%𝐮|%𝐮] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%𝐯|%𝐯] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%𝐰|%𝐰] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%𝐱|%𝐱] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%𝐲|%𝐲] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%𝐳|%𝐳] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%𝑎|%𝑎] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%𝑏|%𝑏] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%𝑐|%𝑐] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%𝑑|%𝑑] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%𝑒|%𝑒] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%𝑓|%𝑓] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%𝑔|%𝑔] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%𝑖|%𝑖] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%𝑗|%𝑗] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%𝑘|%𝑘] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%𝑙|%𝑙] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%𝑚|%𝑚] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%𝑛|%𝑛] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%𝑜|%𝑜] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%𝑝|%𝑝] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝑞|%𝑞] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%𝑟|%𝑟] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%𝑠|%𝑠] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%𝑡|%𝑡] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%𝑢|%𝑢] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%𝑣|%𝑣] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%𝑤|%𝑤] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%𝑥|%𝑥] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%𝑦|%𝑦] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%𝑧|%𝑧] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%𝒂|%𝒂] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%𝒃|%𝒃] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%𝒄|%𝒄] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%𝒅|%𝒅] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%𝒆|%𝒆] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%𝒇|%𝒇] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%𝒈|%𝒈] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%𝒉|%𝒉] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%𝒊|%𝒊] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%𝒋|%𝒋] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%𝒌|%𝒌] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%𝒍|%𝒍] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%𝒎|%𝒎] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%𝒏|%𝒏] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%𝒐|%𝒐] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%𝒑|%𝒑] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝒒|%𝒒] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%𝒓|%𝒓] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%𝒔|%𝒔] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%𝒕|%𝒕] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%𝒖|%𝒖] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%𝒗|%𝒗] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%𝒘|%𝒘] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%𝒙|%𝒙] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%𝒚|%𝒚] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%𝒛|%𝒛] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%𝒶|%𝒶] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%𝒷|%𝒷] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%𝒸|%𝒸] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%𝒹|%𝒹] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%𝒻|%𝒻] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%𝒽|%𝒽] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%𝒾|%𝒾] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%𝒿|%𝒿] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%𝓀|%𝓀] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%𝓁|%𝓁] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%𝓂|%𝓂] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%𝓃|%𝓃] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%𝓅|%𝓅] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝓆|%𝓆] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%𝓇|%𝓇] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%𝓈|%𝓈] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%𝓉|%𝓉] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%𝓊|%𝓊] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%𝓋|%𝓋] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%𝓌|%𝓌] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%𝓍|%𝓍] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%𝓎|%𝓎] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%𝓏|%𝓏] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%𝓪|%𝓪] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%𝓫|%𝓫] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%𝓬|%𝓬] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%𝓭|%𝓭] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%𝓮|%𝓮] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%𝓯|%𝓯] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%𝓰|%𝓰] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%𝓱|%𝓱] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%𝓲|%𝓲] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%𝓳|%𝓳] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%𝓴|%𝓴] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%𝓵|%𝓵] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%𝓶|%𝓶] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%𝓷|%𝓷] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%𝓸|%𝓸] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%𝓹|%𝓹] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝓺|%𝓺] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%𝓻|%𝓻] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%𝓼|%𝓼] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%𝓽|%𝓽] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%𝓾|%𝓾] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%𝓿|%𝓿] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%𝔀|%𝔀] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%𝔁|%𝔁] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%𝔂|%𝔂] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%𝔃|%𝔃] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%𝔞|%𝔞] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%𝔟|%𝔟] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%𝔠|%𝔠] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%𝔡|%𝔡] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%𝔢|%𝔢] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%𝔣|%𝔣] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%𝔤|%𝔤] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%𝔥|%𝔥] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%𝔦|%𝔦] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%𝔧|%𝔧] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%𝔨|%𝔨] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%𝔩|%𝔩] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%𝔪|%𝔪] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%𝔫|%𝔫] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%𝔬|%𝔬] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%𝔭|%𝔭] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝔮|%𝔮] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%𝔯|%𝔯] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%𝔰|%𝔰] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%𝔱|%𝔱] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%𝔲|%𝔲] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%𝔳|%𝔳] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%𝔴|%𝔴] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%𝔵|%𝔵] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%𝔶|%𝔶] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%𝔷|%𝔷] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%𝕒|%𝕒] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%𝕓|%𝕓] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%𝕔|%𝕔] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%𝕕|%𝕕] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%𝕖|%𝕖] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%𝕗|%𝕗] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%𝕘|%𝕘] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%𝕙|%𝕙] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%𝕚|%𝕚] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%𝕛|%𝕛] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%𝕜|%𝕜] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%𝕝|%𝕝] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%𝕞|%𝕞] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%𝕟|%𝕟] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%𝕠|%𝕠] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%𝕡|%𝕡] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝕢|%𝕢] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%𝕣|%𝕣] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%𝕤|%𝕤] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%𝕥|%𝕥] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%𝕦|%𝕦] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%𝕧|%𝕧] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%𝕨|%𝕨] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%𝕩|%𝕩] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%𝕪|%𝕪] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%𝕫|%𝕫] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%𝖆|%𝖆] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%𝖇|%𝖇] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%𝖈|%𝖈] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%𝖉|%𝖉] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%𝖊|%𝖊] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%𝖋|%𝖋] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%𝖌|%𝖌] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%𝖍|%𝖍] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%𝖎|%𝖎] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%𝖏|%𝖏] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%𝖐|%𝖐] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%𝖑|%𝖑] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%𝖒|%𝖒] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%𝖓|%𝖓] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%𝖔|%𝖔] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%𝖕|%𝖕] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%𝖖|%𝖖] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%𝖗|%𝖗] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%𝖘|%𝖘] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%𝖙|%𝖙] -> {t} || _ ,,
